src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON A_ARMAS !!≈ @CODE@ armas:arma
+Pos:%{back%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES        ;
+Comp:%{back%}h%{aä%}mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Superl:%{back%}hi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_VARVAS !!≈ @CODE@ varvas:varva
+Pos:%{back%} NMN_VARVAS        ;
+Comp:%{back%}h%{aä%}mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Superl:%{back%}hi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_TUORES !!≈ @CODE@ tuores:tuore
!!≈ * Yaml: **A-tuores**
+Pos:%{back%} NMN_TUORES ;
+Comp:%{back%}hemb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Superl:%{back%}hi NMN_ENIN        ;

!LEXICON A_SUURIM !!≈ @CODE@ suurim:suurim
!:%{back%}	NMN_SUURIM ;

LEXICON A_SUARI !!≈ @CODE@ suari:suar
+Pos:%{back%} A_SUARI/KIELI_01 ;

LEXICON A_KIELI !!≈ @CODE@ kieli:kiel
:%{front%} A_SUARI/KIELI_01 ;
LEXICON A_SUARI/KIELI_01 !!≈ @CODE@ suari:suar
+Pos:	NMN_SUARI/KIELI	;
+Comp:emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Superl:i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_VUOZI !!≈ @CODE@ vuozi:vuod
+Pos:%{back%}	NMN_VUOZI/VEZI ;
+Comp:%{back%}%^WGStem%>emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Superl:%{back%}%^WGStem%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_VEZI !!≈ @CODE@ vezi:ved
+Pos:%{front%}     NMN_VUOZI/VEZI ;

LEXICON A_NIMI !!≈ @CODE@ nimi:nim
+Pos:%{front%}        NMN_HANGI/NIMI  ;
+Comp:%{front%}emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Superl:%{front%}i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_JÄLGI  !!≈ @CODE@ jälgi:jälg
!! front vowel
!! gradation Yes
+Pos:%{front%}        NMN_JÄLGI  ;
+Comp:%{front%}emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Superl:%{front%}i NMN_ENIN        ;



!! ### TWO-SYLLABLE WORD WITH CONSONANT-FINAL STEM
!LEXICON A_VANUIN !!≈ @CODE@ vanuin:vanui
!:%{back%} NMN_VANUIN	 ;

LEXICON A_VAŽEN !!≈ @CODE@ važen:važe
+Pos:%{back%} NMN_VAŽEN   ;


LEXICON A_LÄMMIN !!≈ @CODE@ lämmin:lämbi
+Pos:%{front%}	NMN_LÄMMIN   ;

LEXICON A_TAIGIN !!≈ @CODE@ taigin:taigin
+Pos:%{back%}	NMN_TAIGIN   ;

LEXICON A_SALBOIN !!≈ @CODE@ salboin:salboi
+Pos:%{back%} NMN_SALBOIN ;

LEXICON A_ENIN !!≈ @CODE@ enin:eni
+Pos:%{front%} NMN_ENIN-SG ;
+Pos:%{front%} NMN_ENIN-PL ;



LEXICON Adj-NB-i
! These cases are symmetrically marked for number
+Pos+Sg: Adj-NB-01 ;
+Pos+Pl:%>i Adj-NB-01 ;
! The next two share the same stem vowel
+Pos+Sg: SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF ;
+Pos+Pl: PLNOMSUF ;

!LEXICON Adj-NB-loi
!! These cases are symmetrically marked for number
!+Sg: Adj-NB-01 ;
!+Pl:%>loi Adj-NB-01 ;
!! The next two share the same stem vowel
!+Sg: SG-ACC/APR/COM/GENSUF ;
!+Pl: PLNOMSUF ;

LEXICON Adj-NB-01
+Ess:%^WGStem%>nn%{uy%} K ;
+Tra:%^WGStem%>kse K ;
+Ine:%^WGStem%>s K ;
+Ela:%^WGStem%>s K ;
+Ill:%>h K ;
+Ade:%^WGStem%>l K ;
+Abl:%^WGStem%>l K ;
+All:%^WGStem%>le K ;
+Abe:%^WGStem%>tt%{aä%}h K ;
+Err/Orth+Abe:%^WGStem%>tt%{aä%} K ;
+Err/Orth+Abe:%^WGStem%>t%{aä%} K ;
+Prl:%>či K ;
+Apr:%^WGStem%>ll%{uy%}%{oö%} K ;
+Ter:%^WGStem%>ss%{aä%}h K ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
